Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is
increased by $11,625,863, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$601,603, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $3,621,420, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs, is  increased by
$5,369,793, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 1
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency  programs, is increased by $10,189,756, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the  Department of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is decreased
by $4,280,647, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of  Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is in-
creased by $2,299,564, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for child welfare programs, is decreased by $521,132,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human  Services, for child welfare programs, is decreased by
$4,787,712, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $109,646,891, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is  increased by
$24,365,766, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for aging and people  with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $218,953,855, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is increased by $35,234,037, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 2
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $155,598,103, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 15.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  central services, is increased by $276,290, for in-
creased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services, is increased by $8,204, for  increased personal
services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for central  services, is increased by $188,188,
for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is
increased by $786,320, for increased personal services costs related to  pay equity adjust-
ments.
SECTION 19. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for state assessments and enterprise-wide costs, is increased by
$69,775, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 20.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (2), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  state assessments and enterprise-wide
costs, is increased by $570,758, for increased personal services  costs related to pay equity
adjustments.
SECTION 21. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (8), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for  shared services, is increased by $1,426,853, for increased per-
sonal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 3
SECTION 22. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for self-sufficiency programs, is  increased by
$1,746,972, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 23. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by $874, for increased
personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 24.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for  self-sufficiency programs, is increased
by $1,114,389, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 25. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by
$146,453, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 26. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for  vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by $2,408, for
increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 27. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (4), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for vocational  rehabilitation services, is in-
creased by $463,462, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 28. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for child welfare programs,  is increased by $5,687,511,
for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 29. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$2,232,035, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 30.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is in-
creased by $1,956,098, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 4
SECTION 31. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for aging and people with disabilities programs, is increased by
$21,382, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 32. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (6), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities pro-
grams, is increased by $1,788,602,  for increased personal services costs related to pay equity
adjustments.
SECTION 33. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is increased by $1,292,970, for  increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjust-
ments.
SECTION 34. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (7), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased  by $2,254,035, for increased personal services costs related to pay eq-
uity adjustments.
SECTION 35.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (8), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is  increased by
$6,685,528, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 36. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human  Services, for Oregon Eligibility Partnership, is increased by $5,663, for in-
creased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 37. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (8), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for Oregon  Eligibility Partnership, is in-
creased by $5,090,753, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 38. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for child welfare programs,  is increased by $1,384,605,
for position compensation adjustments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 5
SECTION 39. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is increased by
$620,037, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 40.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for child  welfare programs, is increased by $10,000,000,
for temporary lodging prevention.
SECTION 41. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery, Social Security  Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section  2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for central services,  is increased by $3,200,000, for emergency
stockpile distribution.
SECTION 42. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  central services, is increased by $534,673, for
wildfire costs associated with the 2024 fire season.
SECTION 43. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by $15,000,000, for
employment-related day care payments.
SECTION 44. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (1), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for operations and health services, is decreased by
$19,031,039, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 45. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (2), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for central administration and administrative  services,
is increased by $12,495,644, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 46. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (3), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for correctional services, is increased by $7,385,395, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 47.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (4), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for community corrections, is decreased by $600,000, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 48. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (6), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for capital improvements, is decreased  by $250,000, for a
budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 6
SECTION 49. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Corrections, for operations and  health
services, is increased by $500,000, for a residential substance abuse treatment grant.
SECTION 50. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Corrections, for operations and health
services, is increased by $390,802, for the electronic health record project.
SECTION 51. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 10, chapter 605, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses by the Department of Cor-
rections from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys
received by the Oregon  Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the De-
partment of Corrections, for operations and health services, is increased  by $105,402, for the
electronic health record project.
SECTION 52. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (4), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  community corrections, is increased by $2,297,691, for
the reimbursement to counties for the costs of incarcerated persons sentenced  under felony
driving under the influence of intoxicants.
SECTION 53. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (1), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for operations and health services, is increased by
$16,100,000, for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 54. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section  1 (2), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for central administration and administrative services,
is increased by $1,000,000, for increased personal services costs related  to pay equity adjust-
ments.
SECTION 55. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (3), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for correctional services, is increased by $500,000,  for in-
creased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 56. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (4), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for community  corrections, is increased by $100,000, for
increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 57. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (1), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations and health services, is  increased by
$1,900,000, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Corrections by section 1  (2), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for central administration and administrative  services,
is increased by $1,089,830, for risk state government service charges related to COVID-19.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 7
or received by the Department of Corrections, is increased by $390,600, for a Braille tran-
scription training grant.
SECTION 60. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Department of Justice,  for the Civil Enforcement Division, is
increased by $750,000, for the Medicaid fraud control unit.
SECTION 61. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice,  for the Appellate Division, is in-
creased by $1,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 62. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (8), chapter 382, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice, for  the Trial Division, is decreased
by $1,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 63. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (2), chapter 360, Oregon  Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations,  is increased by $123,000, for state match-
ing funds for the Portland Air National Guard Civil Engineering program.
SECTION 64. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (1), chapter 360, Oregon  Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for administration,  is increased by $798,725, for a budget
realignment and increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 65. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Military Department by section 1 (2), chapter 360, Oregon  Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for operations, is increased by $89,226, for increased  per-
sonal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 66. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 357, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Department  of Emergency Management, for the
911 Emergency Program, is increased by $3,500,000, for managed services contracts.
SECTION 67. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Department of Emergency Management by section 1 (2), chapter  357,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for preparedness and response, is
increased by $5,000,000, for the disaster preparedness stockpile.
SECTION 68. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 482, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $200,000, for telecommunicator and emergency medical  dispatcher
training.
SECTION 69. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 482, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 8
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $250,554, for the addition of one basic corrections local class.
SECTION 70. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 482, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $300,000, for traffic safety training.
SECTION 71. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 482, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $260,000, for increased personal services costs related to pay eq-
uity adjustments.
SECTION 72.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 482, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of  Public Safety Standards and Training, for
operations, is increased by $350,000, for a firing range controller replacement.
SECTION 73. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 487, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  facility programs, is increased by $2,303,604, for increased
personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 74. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (1), chapter 487, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  facility programs, is increased by $1,200,000, for a budget
realignment.
SECTION 75. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 487, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for community programs, is decreased by $1,700,000, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 76. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3, chapter 224, Oregon Laws 2023,  for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Department of the State Fire Marshal, is increased by $400,000,  for Haz-
ardous Materials Emergency Preparedness Program grants.
SECTION 77. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of the State Fire Marshal by section  1, chapter 224, Oregon Laws
2023, for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $6,000,000, for the Wildfire Season
Staffing Grant program.
SECTION 78. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (6), chapter 380,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for third-party debt collection, is decreased by $2,500,000, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 79. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (1), chapter 380,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, for judicial compensation, is decreased  by $2,000,000, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 80. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Judicial Department by section 1 (3), chapter 380,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 9
biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for mandated payments, is increased by $8,500,000, for pay-
ment of court interpreters.
SECTION 81. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Commission on Judicial Fitness and Disability by section 1 (2), chapter 381,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for extraordinary expenses, is in-
creased by $75,000, for investigations and prosecutions.
SECTION 82.
Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Workers’ Compensation Board, is increased by  $3,809, for increased personal services costs
related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 83. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (2), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Workers’ Compensation Division, is increased by $93,834, for increased  personal services
costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 84. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, for
Oregon OSHA, is increased by $45,393, for increased  personal services costs related to pay
equity adjustments.
SECTION 85. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (4), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Central Services Division, is increased by $58,233,  for increased personal services costs re-
lated to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 86. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Division of Financial Regulation, is increased by $166,320, for increased  personal services
costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 87. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (6), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Building Codes Division, is increased  by $41,662, for increased personal services costs related
to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 88. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Consumer and Business Services by section 8, chapter 613,
Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Universal Health Plan
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 10
Governance Board, is increased  by $7,290, for increased personal services costs related to pay
equity adjustments.
SECTION 89. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (3), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Department  of Consumer and Business Services, for
Oregon OSHA, is increased by $13,651, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 90. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 1 (4), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for  the
Central Services Division, is increased by $112,557, for position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 91. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 1 (5), chapter 354, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected  or received by the Department of Consumer and Business Services, for the
Division of Financial Regulation, is  increased by $671,081, for position compensation adjust-
ments.
SECTION 92. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 350, Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, and  including federal funds for contract
services, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 350,
Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by the State  Department of Agriculture, for natural
resources, is increased by $418,079, for Japanese beetle eradication efforts.
SECTION 93.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 452, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for water quality, is increased by $1,010,000, for
legal expenses.
SECTION 94. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 452, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for water quality, is increased by $250,000,  for
domestic well sampling in Crook County.
SECTION 95. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (1), chapter 452, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for air quality, is increased by $375,968, for po-
sition compensation adjustments.
SECTION 96.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (2), chapter 452, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for water quality, is increased by $812,365,  for
position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 97. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (3), chapter 452, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for land quality,  is increased by $34,295, for po-
sition compensation adjustments.
SECTION 98. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department  of Environmental Quality by section 1 (4), chapter 452, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  agency management, is increased by $33,082,
for position compensation adjustments.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 11
SECTION 99. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6,  chapter 452, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the Department of Envi-
ronmental Quality from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery  Fund
moneys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred  to
the Department of Environmental Quality, for the Onsite Septic Financial Aid  Program, is
increased by $2,700,000.
SECTION 100. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Land Use Board of Appeals by section  1, chapter 456, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $225,824, for increased personal ser-
vices costs related to pay equity and position compensation adjustments.
SECTION 101. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made  to the Water Resources Department by section 1 (5), chapter 460, Oregon Laws
2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  director’s office, is increased by
$1,872,852, for legal expenses.
SECTION 102. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (6), chapter 460,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses by the Water Resources
Department from American Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund mon-
eys received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the
Water Resources Department, for dam analyses, is increased by $300,000.
SECTION 103.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Emergency Board by section 413 (1), chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, to be  allocated to the Oregon Department of Emergency
Management for a disaster preparedness stockpile, is decreased by $5,000,000.
SECTION 104. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Commission for  the Blind by section 1, chapter 376, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $67,779, for increased personal  services
costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 105. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter  376, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Commission for the Blind, is increased by $66,574, for increased personal
services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 106. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 376, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Commission for the Blind, is increased by $1,770,806, for  increased
caseload costs.
SECTION 107. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 9 (2), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department, for business, inno-
vation and trade, is increased by $2,000,000, for small and medium  sized manufacturer as-
sistance.
SECTION 108.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 9 (3), chapter 475,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds
collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department,  for infrastructure,
is increased by $149,230, for state digital equity capacity.
SECTION 109. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 12
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of  $2,500,000, for deposit into the Strategic Re-
serve Fund established by ORS 285B.266.
SECTION 110. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to  the Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30,
2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $2,500,000, for business, innovation and trade,
for Port of Portland Terminal 6 operating expenses.
SECTION 111.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Business Development Department, for operations, is increased by $120,282, for the Economic
Development Management System information technology project.
SECTION 112.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter  475, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Business Development Department,  for oper-
ations, is increased by $106,663, for  the Economic Development Management System infor-
mation technology project.
SECTION 113. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1 (4), chapter  385, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission, for agents’
compensation - all other, is decreased by $1,212,253, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 114. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1 (1), chapter 385,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission, for adminis-
trative expenses, is increased by $1,212,253, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 115. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the State Forestry Department by section 1 (2), chapter 453, Oregon  Laws
2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for forest resources, is decreased by $5,700,000,
for the Small Forestland Investment in Stream Habitat Program Fund.
SECTION 116. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the State Forestry Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out  of the
General Fund, the amount of $5,700,000, to be deposited into the Small Forestland Investment
in Stream Habitat  Program Fund established under ORS 526.404, to provide grants to eligible
small forestland owners pursuant to ORS 526.402.
SECTION 117. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,700,000 is established for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the State Forestry Department pursuant  to ORS 526.402 from the
Small Forestland Investment  in Stream Habitat Program Fund established under ORS
526.404.
SECTION 118. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 455, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Department of Land Conservation and  Development, is increased
by $702,035, for funding agreements with other state agencies.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 13
SECTION 119. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  363, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received as reimburse-
ment from the United States Department of Transportation, but  excluding lottery funds and
federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 363, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received
by the Department of Transportation, for maintenance, is increased by $15,000,000, for costs
of emergency repair due to 2024 storm damage.
SECTION 120.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 458, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds collected
or received by the Secretary of  State, is increased by $250,000, for a voter registration re-
placement project.
SECTION 121. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (1), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for the Executive Division, is decreased
by $200,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 122. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by  section 1 (2), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Compliance, Audit and Performance
Division, is decreased by $250,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 123. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by  section 1 (4), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Adult Trial Division, is decreased
by $9,700,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 124. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (9), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the Administrative Services Division,
is decreased by $1,600,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 125. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 481,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the Oregon  Public Defense Commission, for the Parent Child
Representation Program, is decreased by $1,901,771, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 126. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (3), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Appellate Division, is increased  by
$140,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 127. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by  section 1 (5), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for the Juvenile Trial Division, is increased
by $74,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 128. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by  section 1 (6), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for Preauthorized Expenses, is increased
by $7,400,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 129. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for Court Mandated Expenses, is increased
by $1,600,000, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 14
SECTION 130. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense  Commission by section 1 (8), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Parent Child Representation  Pro-
gram, is increased by $2,100,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 131. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Public Defense Commission by section 1  (10), chapter 481, Oregon
Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  Special Programs, Contracts and
Distributions Division, is increased by $436,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 132. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2, chapter 62, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees,  moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon Board of Naturopathic Medicine, is increased by  $25,000,
for increased personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 133.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 6, chapter 62, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Oregon State Veterinary Medical Examining Board, is  increased
by $53,000, for legal expenses.
SECTION 134.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 1  (6)(b)(B), chapter 457, Oregon Laws 2023, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses from fees,
moneys or other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and
federal funds, collected or received  by the Public Employees Retirement System, for the
ORION Modernization Project  - client relationship management, is decreased by $400,000, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 135. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of
$400,000 is established for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Public Employees
Retirement System, for the  ORION Modernization Project, for an independent assessment
of the replacement alternatives for the core pension administration system.
SECTION 136. Section 311, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 311.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is  appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $126,000, for state support for  public universities, [ for a budget rea-
lignment] for the delivery of college-in-prison courses for  the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 academic
years.
SECTION 137.
 Section 312, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 312.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is  appropriated to the
Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $180,000, for state  support for community colleges, [ for a budget rea-
lignment] for the delivery of college-in-prison courses for  the 2023-2024 and 2024-2025 academic
years.
SECTION 138.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (7), chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for  Oregon National Guard tuition
assistance, is increased by $1,112,984.
SECTION 139. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (6), chapter 454,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 15
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending  June 30, 2025, for the Oregon Tribal Student
Grant, is increased by $2,267,204.
SECTION 140. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (1),  chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for programs  and operations, is
decreased by $661,800, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 141. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to  the Higher Education Coordinating Commission by section 1 (5), chapter 454,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for Oregon Promise grants, is in-
creased by $3,600,000.
SECTION 142. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter 454,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds and funds described in sections 12 to 16, chapter 454, Oregon  Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is increased by $3,000,000, for private grant awards.
SECTION 143.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described in  sections 12 to 16, chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for programs and related grants,
is increased by $3,500,000, for the Oregon Opportunity Grant program.
SECTION 144.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for shared services, is increased by $3,000,000, for a budget  rea-
lignment.
SECTION 145. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 610, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for vocational rehabilitation services, is increased by  $3,000,000, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 146. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (7), chapter  610, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 610,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $130,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 147.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Oregon Youth Authority by section 1 (3), chapter 487, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for program support, is increased by $500,000, for a
budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 16
SECTION 148. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by  section 77, chapter 605,
Oregon Laws 2023, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the payment of state legal costs
related to sections 1 and 2, chapter 105, Oregon Laws 2022, is increased by $1,500,000.
SECTION 149. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of Administrative Services by  section 78, chapter 605,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the  payment of court-awarded
compensation and reasonable attorney fees related to sections 1 and 2, chapter 105, Oregon
Laws 2022, is increased by $6,000,000.
SECTION 150.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter  375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
enterprise goods and services, is increased by $8,700,000, for the risk management program.
SECTION 151.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise goods and services,  is increased by $3,500,000, for the procurement services pro-
gram.
SECTION 152.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise goods and services, is increased by $7,000,000, for the  publishing and distribution
program.
SECTION 153.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise goods and  services, is increased by $750,000, for the financial business systems
program.
SECTION 154.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise goods and services, is increased by $600,000, for the shared  financial services
program.
SECTION 155.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 17
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Chief Human Resources Office, is increased by $800,000, for the policy,  investigations and
compliance program.
SECTION 156. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (6), chapter 375,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
enterprise asset management, is increased by $4,900,000,  for the fleet and parking services
program.
SECTION 157.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 173, chapter 114, Oregon  Laws 2024, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section 173, chapter  114,
Oregon Laws 2024, collected or received  by the Oregon Department of Administrative Ser-
vices, for Mill Creek land sales, is increased by $10,000,000, for disbursement of proceeds.
SECTION 158.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Department of  Administrative Services by section 498, chapter 114,
Oregon Laws 2024, for  the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for distribution to the Coalition
of African and African American Pastors for land acquisition and  development of low-income
housing, is decreased by $1,000,000.
SECTION 159. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3)(a), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for
the Office  of the State Chief Information Officer - Policy, is increased by $1,500,000, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 160.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5)(b), chapter 375, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds received from charges,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in  section 2, chapter 375, Oregon
Laws 2023, collected or received by the Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for
the Office of the State  Chief Information Officer - State Data Center, for pass-through ex-
penditures, is decreased by $1,500,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 161.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 1, chapter 63, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as  the maximum limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or other
revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds,
collected or received by the Public  Records Advocate, is increased by $30,000, for increased
personal services costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 162.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Employment Relations Board by section  1, chapter 79, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is  increased by $70,000, for increased personal services
costs related to pay equity adjustments.
SECTION 163. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3, chapter 79, Oregon Laws 2023, for the  biennium ending
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 18
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses from moneys received from the
assessment against state agencies described in ORS 240.167 and  transferred to the Employ-
ment Relations Board Administrative  Account, is increased by $125,000, for increased per-
sonal services costs.
SECTION 164. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Teacher Standards  and Practices Commission by section 1, chapter 484,
Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, is increased by $1,000,000,  for the
educator data systems project.
SECTION 165. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department  of Corrections by section 1 (4), chapter 377, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025,  for community corrections, is increased by $5,197,236,
for a budget realignment.
SECTION 166. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 377,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by  the Department of Corrections, for community corrections,
is decreased by $5,197,236, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 167. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Judicial Department by  section 1 (4), chapter 380, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for state court technology systems, is increased  by
$960,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 168. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (4), chapter 380,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and including reimbursements from federal
service agreements,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described in section
2, chapter 380, Oregon Laws  2023, collected or received by the Judicial Department, for the
State Court Technology Fund, is decreased by $960,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 169.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section  1, chapter 450, Oregon Laws 2023, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the State School Fund, is decreased by $13,944,096, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 170.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 4, chapter 450, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit  for payment of expenses by the Department of Ed-
ucation from fees,  moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but
excluding lottery funds  and federal funds, collected or received by the department for the
State School Fund from the Fund for Student Success established under ORS 327.001, is in-
creased by $13,944,096, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 171.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Health Systems Division - Administration, is
increased by $13,804,118, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 172. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (2), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Health Systems Division - Programs, is in-
creased by $111,361,056, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 173.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (3), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for health policy and analytics, is decreased by
$7,285,309, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 19
SECTION 174. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (4), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for public  health, is increased by $2,546,800, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 175. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (5), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, for the Oregon State Hospital, is increased by
$72,295,249, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 176. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon  Health Authority by section 1 (6), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, for central services, is  increased by $3,589,516, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 177. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (1), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received  by the Oregon Health Authority, for the Health Systems Division -
Administration, is increased by $7,793, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 178. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (2), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the Health Systems  Division -
Programs, is increased by $318,473,106, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 179. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health policy and analytics, is in-
creased by $2,552,934, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 180.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (5), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for public health, is increased  by
$12,147,601, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 181. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 2 (7), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for the Oregon State Hospital, is de-
creased by $7,522,404, for a budget realignment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 20
SECTION 182. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 2 (8), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and  federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023,
collected or received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for central services, is increased by
$733,128, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 183. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section  2 (10), chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 591, Oregon  Laws 2023,
collected or received by the  Oregon Health Authority, for shared administrative services, is
increased by $8,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 184. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 7, chapter 591, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Public Employees’
Benefit Board  from the Public Employees’ Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and
self-insurance, is increased by $328,635,726, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 185. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 8, chapter 591, Oregon Laws  2023, for the biennium end-
ing June 30, 2025,  as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Oregon Educators
Benefit Board  from the Oregon Educators Revolving Fund for benefit plan premiums and
self-insurance, is increased by $65,817,503, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 186. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (1), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for Health  Systems Division - Administration, is decreased by $504,545, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 187.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 3 (2), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for  payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for the Health  Systems Division - Programs, is increased by $479,545, for
a budget realignment.
SECTION 188.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 3 (3), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from lottery moneys
allocated from the Administrative Services Economic Development Fund to the Oregon
Health Authority, for  health policy and analytics, is increased by $25,000, for a budget rea-
lignment.
SECTION 189.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for the Health Systems Division - Administration,
is increased by $14,756,219, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 190. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (2), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 21
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for the Health Systems Division - Programs, is
increased by $619,979,539, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 191. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health  Authority, for health policy and analytics, is increased by
$64,619, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 192. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (4), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for public health, is increased by $495,000, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 193.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (6), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the  Oregon Health Authority, central services, is increased by $5,255,484, for a
budget realignment.
SECTION 194. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 5 (7), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for state assessments  and enterprise-wide costs,
is increased by $5,000,000, for a budget realignment.
SECTION 195. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the  General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1 (1), chapter  591, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the  biennium ending June 30, 2025, for the Health Systems Division - Administration, is
increased by $1,300,000, for contracted professional services related  to development and im-
plementation of federal Medicaid waivers.
SECTION 196. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 591,  Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30,  2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 591, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Oregon  Health Authority, for the Health Systems Division - Administration,
is increased by $1,300,000,  for contracted professional services related to development and
implementation of federal Medicaid waivers.
SECTION 197. In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium  ending June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $3,200,000, to carry out the provisions of
section 51, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by section  5, chapter ___, Oregon Laws
2025 (Enrolled Senate Bill 10).
SECTION 198. In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the  Housing and Community Services Department, for the biennium ending June
30, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $14,757, to  reimburse the Oregon Facilities
Authority for administrative costs incurred for the  moderate income housing predevelop-
ment loan program.
SECTION 199. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 4 (1), chapter  485, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 22
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts and the Oregon War Veterans’ Bond Sink-
ing Account, but  excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the De-
partment of Veterans’ Affairs, for administration, grants and services supplied  to veterans,
is increased by $2,100,000.
SECTION 200. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Oregon Facilities Authority by section 53, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2025, for deposit into the Oregon Facilities Authority Ac-
count, is decreased by $3,613,925.
SECTION 201. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 53a, chapter  13, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of  expenses by the Oregon Facilities
Authority from the Oregon Facilities Authority Account, created under ORS  289.130, for the
purposes of section 51, chapter 13, Oregon Laws 2023, is decreased by $3,613,925.
SECTION 202. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation  on
expenditures established by section 53b, chapter  13, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and  federal
funds, collected or received by the State Treasurer, for the purpose of oversight and admin-
istration of financing by the  Oregon Facilities Authority under section 51, chapter 13, Oregon
Laws 2023, is decreased by $263,925.
SECTION 203.
In addition to and not in lieu of  any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Legislative Policy and Research Office, for the biennium ending June  30, 2025,
out of the General Fund, the amount of  $50,000, for a professional services contract to con-
duct a management review of the Department of Transportation.
SECTION 204. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$5,477,729 is established, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from the School Stabilization  Subac-
count for Wildfire-impacted School Districts established under section 4, chapter 43, Oregon
Laws 2022.
SECTION 205.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on
expenditures established by section 8 (1), chapter  454, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues,  including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds and funds described in  sections 12 to 16, chapter 454, Oregon Laws 2023, collected or
received by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission programs and related grants, is  increased by $15,000, for the cost of is-
suing general obligation bonds for the Klamath Community College Childcare Learning
Center.
SECTION 206.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the authorized appropriations
and expenditure limitations for the biennium  ending June 30, 2025, for the following agencies
and programs are changed by the amounts specified:
(1) ADMINISTRATION.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 23
Oregon Department of
Administrative Services:
Debt Service - ODAS
Other funds Ch. 375 2(12) -508,030
Department of Revenue:
Debt Service and Related
Costs
General Fund Ch. 361 1(7) -148,150
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis
Commission:
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 385 1(7) -7,966,537
(2) ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Business Development
Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 475 1(2) -6,874,760
Housing and Community
Services Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 390 5 -401,960
(3) EDUCATION.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Higher Education
Coordinating Commission:
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Public Universities
General Fund Ch. 454
1(11)(a) -52,230
Debt Service
general obligation bonds
Financial Assistant Management
Information Systems project
General Fund Ch. 454
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 24
1(11)(d) -52,250
(4) HUMAN SERVICES.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Oregon Health Authority:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 591 1(9) -86,700
(5) LEGISLATIVE BRANCH.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Legislative Administration
Committee:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 383 1(2) -1,349,980
(6) NATURAL RESOURCES.
2023
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $ 
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
State Forestry Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 453 1(4) -812,009
Other funds Ch. 453 2(7) -1,225,170
State Department of
Fish and Wildlife:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 590 1(4) -46,928
(7) PUBLIC SAFETY.
2023
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 25
Oregon Laws
Chapter/ $
Agency/Program/Funds Section Adjustment
Department of Corrections:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 377 1(5) -700,440
Department of Justice:
Debt Service
Other funds Ch. 605 134 -259,570
Oregon Military
Department:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 360 1(4) -86,910
Department of State Police:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 386 1(5) -2,287,077
Oregon Youth Authority:
Debt Service
General Fund Ch. 487 1(6) -2,802,560
SECTION 207. Section 9, chapter 109, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 9.  In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropriated to the
Oregon Business Development Department, for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of  the Gen-
eral Fund, the following amounts for distribution to the following  entities for the following
infrastructure projects to support the development of housing:
(1) $2,100,000 to the City of Albany for extension of water and sewer infrastructure.
(2) $3,000,000 to the City of Beaverton for the Kemmer  Booster Pump Station to provide drink-
ing water supply to new neighborhoods in Cooper Mountain Community Plan Area.
(3) $1,500,000 to the City of  Butte Falls for wastewater treatment plant and lift station upgrades.
(4) $1,186,000  to the City of Chiloquin for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for
Street/King Kong Housing Development and Valley Street/Mountain Street.
(5) $3,000,000 to the City of Cottage  Grove to install water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure
for a 35-acre parcel the city owns for housing development.
(6) $1,000,000 to the City of Creswell for wastewater treatment facility upgrades and connections
to a regional treatment facility.
(7) $1,300,000 to the City of Culver  for mainline sewer reroute to provide sewer to residential
development.
(8) $1,000,000 to the City of Dallas  for sewer and stormwater infrastructure upgrades for La
Creole Node master plan.
(9) $6,000,000  to the City of Eugene for stormwater, transportation,  water and sewer
infrastructure improvements [ along] near the project area of  Crow Road.
(10) $1,900,000 to the City of Florence for water, sewer and wastewater infrastructure for four
blocks of city-owned property to be developed.
(11) $1,000,000 to the  City of Gold Hill for replacement of water distribution main line and im-
provements and upgrades to water treatment facilities.
(12) $3,000,000 to the City of Gresham for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for the
redevelopment of [ former Kmart property in  Civic Neighborhood at NW Eastman Parkway and NW
Burnside Road ] property for affordable housing in Gresham’s Civic Neighborhood .
(13) $2,438,595 to the City of Hood River for water, sewer and stormwater site  improvements for
7.1 acres of [ city-owned] land for housing development.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 26
(14) $1,100,000 to the City of Hubbard for upgrades to a wastewater  lift station, water system
improvements and wastewater system improvements.
(15) $500,000 to the  City of Independence for sewer infrastructure for Polk Community Devel-
opment Corporation on Gun Club Road.
(16) $1,705,000 to the City of Irrigon for water and sewer  infrastructure for the Tumbleweed
development and the Molly development.
(17) $100,000 to the City of Klamath Falls for a new sewer lift station  for housing development.
(18) $250,000 to the Klamath Housing Authority for a new sewer lift station for  housing devel-
opment.
(19) $1,753,185 to [ the City of Lake Oswego for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure  im-
provements for Habitat for Humanity development ] Habitat for Humanity Portland  Region for
water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure for West Lake  Grove and Twenty Fifth Terrace
developments.
(20) $3,000,000 to the City of Lincoln City for a booster pump station  for Spring Lake housing
development.
(21) $1,425,000 to the City of Madras  for water, sewer, transportation and  stormwater
infrastructure for The Heights at Yarrow Apartments and Belmont Lane Apartments.
(22) $2,709,000 to the City  of Manzanita for water , transportation  and stormwater
infrastructure for residential housing development.
(23) $195,094 to the City  of McMinnville for water, stormwater and sewer infrastructure gap
funding for housing development.
(24) $945,000 to the City of Medford to construct a regional stormwater facility to serve the New
Spirit development.
(25) $1,200,000 to the City  of Monmouth for water, sewer and stormwater improvements for
Riddle Road development.
(26) $900,000 to the City of North Bend  for stormwater and sewer collection system upgrades for
Gloria Dei site development and water, sewer  and stormwater infrastructure improvements for
Maple Leaf development.
(27) $3,000,000 to the Oak Lodge Water  Services Authority for wastewater treatment facility
upgrades.
(28) $1,650,000 to  the City of Phoenix for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure improve-
ments to extend water line to service developable property.
(29) $2,000,000 to the City of  Prineville for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure for
multifamily development.
(30) $2,500,000 to the City  of Redmond for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure for
Northpoint Vista development.
(31) $1,500,000 to the City of Shady Cove for development of the city drinking water system.
(32) $3,000,000 to the City of Siletz for wastewater treatment plant upgrades.
(33) $3,000,000 to the City of Springfield for sewer infrastructure  improvements for [ Glenwood
Riverfront area development ] the Jasper Trunk Sewer Extension project .
(34) $3,000,000 to the City of Stayton for sewer infrastructure improvements along Ida Street and
Marion from Evergreen to 4th.
(35) $2,865,000 to the City of Sutherlin for water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure im-
provements for Oak Terrace Village housing development.
(36) $300,000 to the City of Talent for water and sewer  system development charges for
infrastructure and water, sewer and stormwater infrastructure improvements  for housing develop-
ment.
(37) $274,057 to the City of Tillamook for improvements for Jones-Knudson Apartments.
(38) $1,566,000 to the City of  Tigard for sewer and stormwater infrastructure improvements for
housing development.
(39) $3,000,000 to the Tualatin Valley Water District for upgrades to the pump station on  SW
189th Avenue in Beaverton.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 27
(40) $6,000,000 to Prosper Portland  for the extension of NW Johnson Street and associated water
and sewer utilities to support the construction of new affordable housing units.
(41) $6,000,000 to Prosper Portland for the construction of a new [ SW] SE  Water Avenue and
associated water and sewer utilities to support new affordable housing units as a part of the OMSI
District Master Plan.
(42) $4,000,000 to the Warm Springs  Housing Authority for interior and exterior rehabilitation
of two-, three- and four-bedroom houses used as rental units on the Warm Springs Reservation.
(43) $635,000 to the Linn-Benton Housing Authority for infrastructure and site utility costs for
the Valor Place Apartments in Albany.
(44) $300,000 to the City of Salem for an affordable veterans housing development in West Salem.
SECTION 208.
 Section 36, chapter 71, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 36.  In addition to and not in  lieu of any other appropriation, there are appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services, for the biennium ending June 30,  2025, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts, for provision of grants  to the following entities for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) $600,000 to New Directions Northwest, Inc., to build a crisis receiving center addition to the
Recovery Village Crisis Stabilization and Detox Center.
(2) $5,000,000 to Benton County Health Department Behavioral Health Division  to relocate
Children and Family Services.
(3) $4,000,000 to Clackamas County for the construction of a crisis stabilization center.
(4) $500,000  to Clatsop Behavioral Healthcare to acquire detox and substance use disorder
treatment residential beds.
(5) $400,000 to Coos Health and Wellness for the development of a sobering center.
(6) $525,000 to BestCare Treatment Services, Inc., to expand detox capacity in central Oregon.
(7) $1,500,000 to Deschutes County Community  Mental Health Program to support the Deschutes
County Stabilization Center.
(8) $5,000,000 to Adapt Integrated Health Care to support the construction of the Adapt  Recov-
ery Campus.
(9) $500,000 to Addictions Recovery Center, Inc., for sobering center operations.
(10) $1,000,000 to Addictions Recovery Center, Inc., to support the  Substance Use Disorder
Withdrawal Management Expansion project.
(11) $1,500,000 to BestCare Treatment Services, Inc., to  develop culturally specific substance use
disorder residential treatment capacity.
(12) $2,400,000 to Klamath Basin Behavioral Health to support the construction of a residential
treatment facility with a crisis stabilization center.
(13) $2,500,000 to  Transformations Wellness Center for the construction of a residential, co-
occurring, substance use disorder treatment facility with detox beds.
(14) $4,000,000 to  Willamette Family, Inc., to support the construction of the Willamette Family
Medical Detox and Resident Services facility.
(15) $3,500,000  to Lincoln County Health and Human Services Department to support the
Lighthouse Village Apartments Mental Health Housing project.
(16) $5,750,000 to Lifeways, Inc., for the Ontario Medical Plaza project  to [ convert vacant retail
space into ] construct  an integrated healthcare facility with supported housing units.
(17) $11,500,000 to Bridgeway Recovery Services, Inc., for the development of the Bridgeway
Medical Center and substance use disorder treatment residential facilities.
(18) $10,000,000 to Multnomah County to support the construction of a behavioral health drop-off
center.
(19) $4,000,000 to the 4th Dimension Recovery Center (4D Recovery) to  support the acquisition
of a facility to provide adolescent substance use disorder residential and outpatient services.
(20) $4,000,000 to Cascade AIDS Project to purchase the Prism Health  facility located on North
Morris Street, Portland, Oregon.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 28
(21) $333,000 to Wallowa Valley  Center for Wellness to support phase 2 of the Park Street
Transitional Housing project.
(22) $8,000,000 to Wasco County to support the  development of the [ Mid-Columbia Center for
Living Campus ] Columbia Gorge Resolution Center .
(23) $8,900,000 to Washington County Behavioral Health Division to support  the development
of the Center for Addictions Triage and Treatment project.
SECTION 209. Section 479, chapter 114, Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 479. In addition to and not in lieu  of any other appropriation, there are appropriated to the
Oregon Department of Administrative Services,  for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the following amounts, for distribution to the following entities, for the following
purposes:
(1) $5,000,000 to the Eugene Civic Alliance for the Eugene Civic Park Stadium project.
(2) $4,000,000 to the Latino Network for the  La Plaza Esperanza service hub for Portland and
Gresham residents.
(3) $2,500,000 to the Oregon  Vietnamese American Cultural Center to support the acquisition
and development of a community center.
(4) $3,000,000 to Round-Up City Development Corporation to support the construction of the
Pendleton Regional Sports Complex.
(5) $3,000,000 to Willamette University for artificial turf and  lights at Roy S. “Spec” Keene
Stadium at Bush Park to support Salem youth baseball and softball.
(6) $3,605,000 to Clackamas County Children’s  Commission for the Milwaukie Head Start Center.
(7) $2,500,000 to the Emergency Communications of Southern Oregon for the Radio
Infrastructure Build-Out and Modernization project.
(8) $2,000,000 to Nehalem  Bay Health District for the Nehalem Bay Health and Senior Care
Improvement project.
(9) $2,000,000 to Homeless Solutions Coalition of Clackamas County,  Inc. for the Oregon City
Resource Center.
(10) $1,500,000 to Portland Japanese Garden for  The Japan Institute at Portland Japanese Gar-
den.
(11) $400,000 to the Vietnam War Memorial Fund for the Vietnam War Memorial on the Oregon
State Capitol grounds.
(12) $1,437,058 to the Clackamas County Children’s Commission for the Marylhurst Center  for
Children and Families.
(13) $1,000,000 to the City of Junction City for the Alderdale Well project.
(14) $1,317,217 to Samaritan Pacific Health Services, Inc. to support the  Lincoln County Resi-
dential Substance Use Disorder Treatment Facility.
(15) $900,000 to Lane County for emergency communications equipment.
(16) $500,000 to the City of Gresham Fire Department to support  the replacement of the training
tower at Gresham Fire and Emergency Services Station 74.
(17) $190,000 to La Pine Rural Fire Protection District for EMS rescue equipment.
(18) $750,000 to Center for Hope & Safety for the HOPE Plaza project.
(19) $1,500,000 to Homes  for Good Housing Agency for the Ollie Court Housing Project (formerly
Naval Reserve Housing and Early Learning Center Project).
(20) $1,000,000 to Mid-Willamette Family YMCA for Linn County YMCA Veterans Housing.
(21) $750,000  to [ Wonderfolk for The Kidz Outside ] Portland Parks and Recreation  for the
George Park lighting and walkway improvement project.
(22) $2,500,000 to Benton County for housing units as part of the county’s coordinated  response
to housing and homelessness.
SECTION 210.
This 2025 Act being necessary for  the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 29
Passed by Senate March 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House April 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5550 (SB 5550-A) Page 30